hunspell-en-ru/output/en_ru.aff
SFX 28 Y 122
SFX 28 ий ьего ий
SFX 28 ий ьему ий
SFX 28 ий ьим ий
SFX 28 ий ьем ий
SFX 28 ий ья ий
SFX 28 ий ьей ий
SFX 28 ий ью ий
SFX 28 ий ье ий
SFX 28 ий ьи ий
SFX 28 ий ьих ий
SFX 28 ий ьими ий
SFX 28 ень ня ень
SFX 28 ень ню ень
SFX 28 ень нем ень
SFX 28 ень не ень
SFX 28 ень ни ень
SFX 28 ень ней ень
SFX 28 ень ням ень
SFX 28 ень нями ень
SFX 28 ень нях ень
SFX 28 ок ка ок
SFX 28 ок ку ок
SFX 28 ок ком ок
SFX 28 ок ке ок
SFX 28 ок ки ок
SFX 28 ок ков ок
SFX 28 ок кам ок
SFX 28 ок ками ок
SFX 28 ок ках ок
SFX 28 оть тя оть
SFX 28 оть тю оть
SFX 28 оть тем оть
SFX 28 оть те оть
SFX 28 оть ти оть
SFX 28 оть тей оть
SFX 28 оть тям оть
SFX 28 оть тями оть
SFX 28 оть тях оть
SFX 28 ец ца [^аеиол]ец
SFX 28 ец йца [аеио]ец
SFX 28 ец ьца лец
SFX 28 ец цу [^аеиол]ец
SFX 28 ец йцу [аеио]ец
SFX 28 ец ьцу лец
SFX 28 ец йцем [аеи]ец
SFX 28 ец це [^аеиол]ец
SFX 28 ец йце [аеио]ец
SFX 28 ец ьце лец
SFX 28 ец цы [^аеиол]ец
SFX 28 ец йцы [аеио]ец
SFX 28 ец ьцы лец
SFX 28 0 ев [анря]ц
SFX 28 ец йцев [аеи]ец
SFX 28 ец цам [^аеиол]ец
SFX 28 ец йцам [аеио]ец
SFX 28 ец ьцам лец
SFX 28 ец цами [^аеиол]ец
SFX 28 ец йцами [аеио]ец
SFX 28 ец ьцами лец
SFX 28 ец цах [^аеиол]ец
SFX 28 ец йцах [аеио]ец
SFX 28 ец ьцах лец
SFX 28 ек ка [жчш]ек
SFX 28 ёк ька [лнрс]ёк
SFX 28 ек ку [жчш]ек
SFX 28 ёк ьку [лнрс]ёк
SFX 28 ек ком [жчш]ек
SFX 28 ёк ьком [лнрс]ёк
SFX 28 ек ке [жчш]ек
SFX 28 ёк ьке [лнрс]ёк
SFX 28 ек ки [жчш]ек
SFX 28 ёк ьки [лнрс]ёк
SFX 28 ек ков [жчш]ек
SFX 28 ёк ьков [лнрс]ёк
SFX 28 ек кам [жчш]ек
SFX 28 ёк ькам [лнрс]ёк
SFX 28 ек ками [жчш]ек
SFX 28 ёк ьками [лнрс]ёк
SFX 28 ек ках [жчш]ек
SFX 28 ёк ьках [лнрс]ёк
SFX 28 ел ла ел
SFX 28 ел лу ел
SFX 28 ел лом ел
SFX 28 ел ле ел
SFX 28 ел лы ел
SFX 28 ел лов ел
SFX 28 ел лам ел
SFX 28 ел лами ел
SFX 28 ел лах ел
SFX 28 ёл ла ёл
SFX 28 ёл лу ёл
SFX 28 ёл лом ёл
SFX 28 ёл ле ёл
SFX 28 ёл лы ёл
SFX 28 ёл лов ёл
SFX 28 ёл лам ёл
SFX 28 ёл лами ёл
SFX 28 ёл лах ёл
SFX 28 и ям [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX 28 и ам [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX 28 и ями [абеилнорсь]и
SFX 28 и ями [арс]ти
SFX 28 и ами [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX 28 и ях [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX 28 и ах [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX 28 ы ам ы
SFX 28 ы ами ы
SFX 28 ы ах ы
SFX 28 0 м [ая]
SFX 28 0 ми [ая]
SFX 28 0 х [ая]
SFX 28 0 а ин
SFX 28 0 у ин
SFX 28 0 ом ин
SFX 28 0 е ин
SFX 28 ин е нин
SFX 28 ин ы рин
SFX 28 нин н нин
SFX 28 рин р рин
SFX 28 ин ам ин
SFX 28 ин ами ин
SFX 28 ин ах ин

SFX 29 Y 12
SFX 29 ть я [ае]ть
SFX 29 ться ясь [ае]ться
SFX 29 ть я [^аеоу]ять
SFX 29 ться ясь [^аеоу]яться
SFX 29 ять я [аеоу]ять
SFX 29 ться сь [аеоу]яться
SFX 29 ить я [^жчшщ]ить
SFX 29 иться ясь [^жчшщ]иться
SFX 29 ить а [жчшщ]ить
SFX 29 иться ась [жчшщ]иться
SFX 29 ыть оя ыть
SFX 29 ыться оясь ыться

SFX 30 Y 3
SFX 30   y     iness      [^aeiou]y
SFX 30   0     ness       [aeiou]y
SFX 30   0     ness       [^y]

SFX 31 Y 6
SFX 31 евать уя [жшщчц]евать
SFX 31 еваться уясь [жшщчц]еваться
SFX 31 евать юя [^жшщчц]евать
SFX 31 еваться юясь [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX 31 овать уя овать
SFX 31 оваться уясь оваться

SFX 32 Y 4
SFX 32 ть в [аеиоуыя]ть
SFX 32 ться вшись [аеиоуыя]ться
SFX 32 сть в сть
SFX 32 сться вшись сться

SFX 33 Y 4
SFX 33   0     r          e
SFX 33   y     ier        [^aeiou]y
SFX 33   0     er         [aeiou]y
SFX 33   0     er         [^ey]

SFX 34 Y 33
SFX 34 ый 0 [^н]ый
SFX 34 ый а [^н]ый
SFX 34 ый о [^н]ый
SFX 34 ый ы [^н]ый
SFX 34 ный ен [^еёйлнь]ный
SFX 34 ный н [её]ный
SFX 34 йный ен йный
SFX 34 ный он лный
SFX 34 ьный ен ьный
SFX 34 ный на [^н]ный
SFX 34 ный но [^н]ный
SFX 34 ный ны [^н]ный
SFX 34 кий ок [^аеёийоуыь]кий
SFX 34 кий к [аеёиоуы]кий
SFX 34 йкий ек йкий
SFX 34 ький ек ький
SFX 34 ий 0 [гжчхщ]ий
SFX 34 ий а [гжкхчщ]ий
SFX 34 ий о [гкх]ий
SFX 34 ий е [жчщ]ий
SFX 34 ий и [гжкхчщ]ий
SFX 34 ой 0 ой
SFX 34 ой а ой
SFX 34 ой о ой
SFX 34 ой ы [^гх]ой
SFX 34 ой и [гх]ой
SFX 34 нный н нный
SFX 34 ный а [^ё]нный
SFX 34 ённый ена ённый
SFX 34 ный о [^ё]нный
SFX 34 ённый ено ённый
SFX 34 ный ы [^ё]нный
SFX 34 ённый ены ённый

SFX 35 Y 4
SFX 35   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX 35   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX 35   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX 35   0     s          [^sxzhy]

SFX 36 Y 38
SFX 36 овать уй овать
SFX 36 оваться уйся оваться
SFX 36 овать уйте овать
SFX 36 оваться уйтесь оваться
SFX 36 евать уй [жшщчц]евать
SFX 36 евать уйте [жшщчц]евать
SFX 36 еваться уйся [жшщчц]еваться
SFX 36 еваться уйтесь [жшщчц]еваться
SFX 36 евать юй [^жшщчц]евать
SFX 36 евать юйте [^жшщчц]евать
SFX 36 еваться юйся [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX 36 еваться юйтесь [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX 36 ать и [жч]ать
SFX 36 аться ись [жч]аться
SFX 36 сать ши сать
SFX 36 сать шите сать
SFX 36 саться шись саться
SFX 36 саться шитесь саться
SFX 36 ить й [аео]ить
SFX 36 ить йте [аео]ить
SFX 36 иться йся [аео]иться
SFX 36 иться йтесь [аео]иться
SFX 36 ить ь [^аео]ить
SFX 36 ить ьте [^аео]ить
SFX 36 иться ься [^аео]иться
SFX 36 иться ьтесь [^аео]иться
SFX 36 уть ь уть
SFX 36 уть ьте уть
SFX 36 уться ься уться
SFX 36 уться ьтесь уться
SFX 36 ять й [аеоу]ять
SFX 36 ять йте [аеоу]ять
SFX 36 яться йся [аеоу]яться
SFX 36 яться йтесь [аеоу]яться
SFX 36 еть и еть
SFX 36 еться ись еться
SFX 36 еть ите еть
SFX 36 еться итесь еться

SFX 37 N 4
SFX 37   0     st         e
SFX 37   y     iest       [^aeiou]y
SFX 37   0     est        [aeiou]y
SFX 37   0     est        [^ey]

SFX 38 Y 130
SFX 38 вать ю авать
SFX 38 вать ём авать
SFX 38 вать ёшь авать
SFX 38 вать ёте авать
SFX 38 вать ёт авать
SFX 38 вать ют авать
SFX 38 ваться юсь аваться
SFX 38 ваться ёмся аваться
SFX 38 ваться ёшься аваться
SFX 38 ваться ётесь аваться
SFX 38 ваться ётся аваться
SFX 38 ваться ются аваться
SFX 38 евать ую [жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 евать уем [жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 евать уешь [жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 евать уете [жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 евать ует [жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 евать уют [жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 еваться уюсь [жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 еваться уемся [жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 еваться уешься [жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 еваться уетесь [жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 еваться уется [жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 еваться уются [жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 евать юю [^жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 евать юем [^жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 евать юешь [^жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 евать юете [^жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 евать юет [^жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 евать юют [^жшщчц]евать
SFX 38 еваться ююсь [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 еваться юемся [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 еваться юешься [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 еваться юетесь [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 еваться юется [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 еваться юются [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX 38 овать ую овать
SFX 38 овать уем овать
SFX 38 овать уешь овать
SFX 38 овать уете овать
SFX 38 овать ует овать
SFX 38 овать уют овать
SFX 38 оваться уюсь оваться
SFX 38 оваться уемся оваться
SFX 38 оваться уешься оваться
SFX 38 оваться уетесь оваться
SFX 38 оваться уется оваться
SFX 38 оваться уются оваться
SFX 38 ть ю [^аеоу]ять
SFX 38 ять ю [аеоу]ять
SFX 38 ть ем [^аеоу]ять
SFX 38 ять ем [аеу]ять
SFX 38 ять им оять
SFX 38 ть ешь [^аеоу]ять
SFX 38 ять ешь [аеу]ять
SFX 38 ять ишь оять
SFX 38 ть ете [^аеоу]ять
SFX 38 ять ете [аеу]ять
SFX 38 ять ите оять
SFX 38 ть ет [^аеоу]ять
SFX 38 ять ет [аеу]ять
SFX 38 ять ит оять
SFX 38 ть ют [^аеоу]ять
SFX 38 ять ют [аеу]ять
SFX 38 ть т оять
SFX 38 ться юсь [^аеоу]яться
SFX 38 яться юсь [аеоу]яться
SFX 38 ться емся [^аеоу]яться
SFX 38 яться емся [аеу]яться
SFX 38 яться имся ояться
SFX 38 ться ешься [^аеоу]яться
SFX 38 яться ешься [аеу]яться
SFX 38 яться ишься ояться
SFX 38 ться етесь [^аеоу]яться
SFX 38 яться етесь [аеу]яться
SFX 38 яться итесь ояться
SFX 38 ться ется [^аеоу]яться
SFX 38 яться ется [аеу]яться
SFX 38 яться ится ояться
SFX 38 ться ются [^аеоу]яться
SFX 38 яться ются [аеу]яться
SFX 38 ься ся ояться
SFX 38 ать у [жшщч]ать
SFX 38 аться усь [жшщч]аться
SFX 38 ать им [жшщч]ать
SFX 38 аться имся [жшщч]аться
SFX 38 ать ишь [жшщч]ать
SFX 38 аться ишься [жшщч]аться
SFX 38 ать ите [жшщч]ать
SFX 38 аться итесь [жшщч]аться
SFX 38 ать ит [жшщч]ать
SFX 38 аться ится [жшщч]аться
SFX 38 ть т [жшщч]ать
SFX 38 ься ся [жшщч]аться
SFX 38 ать у дать
SFX 38 аться усь даться
SFX 38 ать ём дать
SFX 38 аться ёмся даться
SFX 38 ать ёшь дать
SFX 38 аться ёшься даться
SFX 38 ать ёте дать
SFX 38 аться ётесь даться
SFX 38 ать ёт дать
SFX 38 аться ётся даться
SFX 38 ать ут дать
SFX 38 аться утся даться
SFX 38 чь гу чь
SFX 38 чься гусь чься
SFX 38 чь жём чь
SFX 38 чься жёмся чься
SFX 38 чь жёшь чь
SFX 38 чься жёшься чься
SFX 38 чь жёте чь
SFX 38 чься жётесь чься
SFX 38 чь жёт чь
SFX 38 чься жётся чься
SFX 38 чь гут чь
SFX 38 чься гутся чься
SFX 38 уть у уть
SFX 38 ться сь уться
SFX 38 уть ём уть
SFX 38 уться ёмся уться
SFX 38 уть ёшь уть
SFX 38 уться ёшься уться
SFX 38 уть ёте уть
SFX 38 уться ётесь уться
SFX 38 уть ёт уть
SFX 38 уться ётся уться
SFX 38 ть т уть
SFX 38 ься ся уться
